Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.046

Health information—Conflict with federal requirements.

If any provision in RCW 41.05.036, 41.05.039, and 41.05.042 conflicts with existing or new federal requirements, the director shall recommend modifications, as needed, to assure compliance with the aims of RCW 41.05.036, 41.05.039, and 41.05.042 and federal requirements.

[ 2023 c 51 s 10; 2009 c 300 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—2009 c 300: See note following RCW 41.05.036.